District of Columbia statutes.
47-2208

Surety bonds.

Every vendor or retailer not engaging in business in the District who has been expressly authorized to pay the tax imposed by this chapter and collect reimbursement therefor, and every vendor engaging in business in the District, may, in the discretion of the Council of the District of Columbia, be required to file with the Mayor a bond not exceeding the amount of $10,000 with such sureties as the Council of the District of Columbia deems necessary, and for such duration not exceeding 5 years as the Council of the District of Columbia deems necessary, conditioned upon the payment of the tax due from any vendor or retailer for any period covered by any return required to be filed under this chapter.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 127, ch. 146, title II, § 218
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 221, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-2708.
1981 Ed., § 47-2208.